apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="b/ear__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ear</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ears</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ore</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>orne</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>earing</l>
          <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/eat__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eats</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eat</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eaten</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eating</l>
          <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bec/ome__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omes</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ame</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ome</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oming</l>
          <r>ome<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/all__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alls</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allen</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alling</l>
          <r>all<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beg/et__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>et</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ets</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otten</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>etting</l>
          <r>et<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="beg/in__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inning</l>
          <r>in<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="h/old__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>old</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olds</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eld</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>olding</l>
          <r>old<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="come under scrutiny" a="eleka"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>under<b/>scrutiny</l><r><g><b/>under<b/>scrutiny</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="come just at the right moment" a="eleka"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>just<b/>at<b/>the<b/>right<b/>moment</l><r><g><b/>just<b/>at<b/>the<b/>right<b/>moment</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="fall off" a="eleka"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="fall away" a="eleka"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>away</l><r><g><b/>away</g></r></p></e>
       <e lm="hold a conversation" a="eleka"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>a<b/>conversation</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>conversation</g></r></p></e>
      <e lm="become the norm" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>the<b/>norm</l><r><g><b/>the<b/>norm</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="fall through" a="eleka"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>through</l><r><g><b/>through</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="as come in" a="eleka"><i>as<b/>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="come by sometime"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>by<b/>sometime</l><r><g><b/>by<b/>sometime</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="come by"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>by</l><r><g><b/>by</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="come and pick"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>and<b/>pick</l><r><g><b/>and<b/>pick</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="come round to see" a="eleka"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>round<b/>to<b/>see</l><r><g><b/>round<b/>to<b/>see</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become distressed" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>distressed</l><r><g><b/>distressed</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become sleepy" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>sleepy</l><r><g><b/>sleepy</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="hold on" a="eleka"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="hold on to" a="eleka"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>on<b/>to</l><r><g><b/>on<b/>to</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become embittered" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>embittered</l><r><g><b/>embittered</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become affected" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>affected</l><r><g><b/>affected</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become Americanised" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>Americanised</l><r><g><b/>Americanised</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become friends" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>friends</l><r><g><b/>friends</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="become brutalised" a="eleka"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>brutalised</l><r><g><b/>brutalised</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bear"><i>b</i><par n="b/ear__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="beat"><i>b</i><par n="b/eat__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="become"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="begin"><i>beg</i><par n="beg/in__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="come"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="come back"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come close"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>close</l><r><g><b/>close</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fall down"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fall"><i>f</i><par n="f/all__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hold"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="hold responsible"><i>h</i><par n="h/old__vblex" sa="sep" />         <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>       <p>        <l><b/>responsible</l><r><g><b/>responsible</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="become angry" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>bec</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>angry</l><r><g><b/>angry</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come off" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come off badly" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off<b/>badly</l><r><g><b/>off<b/>badly</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come off best" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off<b/>best</l><r><g><b/>off<b/>best</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="come to an end" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>c</i><par n="bec/ome__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>an<b/>end</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>an<b/>end</g></r></p></e>
